src/fst/affixes/numerals.lexc
LEXICON NUM_22NAANW_PL
:%{back%}     NMN_22NAANW_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_22VAEHAEKENE !!= @CODE@ vähäkene:vähäke
!! Gradation: No
!        NUM_22VAEHAEKENE-SG ;
!        NUM_22VAEHAEKENE_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_22VAEHAEKENE-SG
!:%{front%}     NMN_22VWROKWNW/VAEHAEKENE-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_22VAEHAEKENE_PL
!:%{front%}     NMN_22VWROKWNW/VAEHAEKENE_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_23NUUL1 !!= * @CODE@ nuuĺ:nool
! Gradation: No
! NUM_23NUUL1-SG ;
! NUM_23NUUL1_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_23NUUL1-SG
!:%{back%} NMN_23NUUL1-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_23NUUL1_PL
!:%{back%} NMN_23NUUL1_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_23SUUR1 !!= * @CODE@ suuŕ:suur
! Gradation: No
! NUM_23SUUR1-SG ;
! NUM_23SUUR1_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_23SUUR1-SG
!:%{back%} NMN_23SUUR1-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_23SUUR1_PL
!:%{back%} NMN_23SUUR1_PL ;


!LEXICON NUM_23KIIL1  !!= * @CODE@ kiiĺ:keel
! Gradation: No
! NUM_23KIIL1-SG ;
! NUM_23KIIL1_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_23KIIL1-SG
!:%{front%} NMN_23KIIL1-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_23KIIL1_PL
!:%{front%} NMN_23KIIL1_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_23HIIR1  !!= * @CODE@ hiiŕ:hiir
! Gradation: No
! NUM_23HIIR1-SG ;
! NUM_23HIIR1_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_23HIIR1-SG
!:%{front%} NMN_23HIIR1-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_23HIIR1_PL
!:%{front%} NMN_23HIIR1_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_24KAESI
! gradation: yes
!! vowel_harmony: front
! NUM_24KAESI-SG ;
! NUM_24KAESI_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_24KAESI-SG
!:%{front%} NMN_24KAESI-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_24KAESI_PL
!:%{front%} NMN_24KAESI_PL ;
!+Num+Sg+Numom+WORK: K ;

!LEXICON NUM_24SUSI
! gradation: yes
! vowel_harmony: front
! NUM_24SUSI-SG ;
! NUM_24SUSI_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_24SUSI-SG
!:%{back%} NMN_24SUSI-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_24SUSI_PL
!:%{back%} NMN_24SUSI_PL ;
!+Num+Sg+Numom+WORK: K ;

!LEXICON NUM_25SUEAE
!        NUM_25SUEAE-SG ;
!        NUM_25SUEAE_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_25SUEAE-SG
!:%{front%}     NMN_25SUEAE-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_25SUEAE_PL
!:%{front%}     NMN_25SUEAE_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_25ASWQ
!        NUM_25ASWQ-SG ;
!        NUM_25ASWQ_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_25ASWQ-SG
!:%{back%}     NMN_25ASWQ-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_25ASWQ_PL
!:%{back%}     NMN_25ASWQ_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_26HEPEM1
! NUM_26HEPEM1-SG ;
! NUM_26HEPEM1_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_26HEPEM1-SG
!:%{front%} NMN_26HEPEM1-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_26HEPEM1_PL
!:%{front%} NMN_26HEPEM1_PL ;
!+Num+Sg+Numom+WORK: K ;

!LEXICON NUM_27EHEQ
! NUM_27EHEQ-SG ;
! NUM_27EHEQ_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_27EHEQ-SG
!:%{front%} NMN_27ASTWQ/EHEQ-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_27EHEQ_PL
!:%{front%} NMN_27ASTWQ/EHEQ_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_27KUEMMEND
! NUM_27KUEMMEND-SG ;
! NUM_27KUEMMEND_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_27KUEMMEND-SG
!:%{front%} NMN_27KUEMMEND-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_27KUEMMEND_PL
!:%{front%} NMN_27KUEMMEND_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_HAPU !!= * __@CODE@__ hapu:hapu
! gradation: yes
! NUM_HAPU-SG ;
! NUM_HAPU_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_HAPU-SG
!:%{back%} NMN_27HAPU-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_HAPU_PL
!:%{back%} NMN_27HAPU_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_28TUETAER1 !!= * __@CODE@__ tütäŕ:tütär
! NUM_28TUETAER1-SG ;
! NUM_28TUETAER1_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_28TUETAER1-SG
!:%{front%} NMN_28TUETAER1-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_28TUETAER1_PL
!:%{front%} NMN_28TUETAER1_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_28PINNAER1 !!= * __@CODE@__ pinnäŕ:pindär
! NUM_28PINNAER1-SG ;
! NUM_28PINNAER1_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_28PINNAER1-SG
!:%{front%} NMN_28PINNAER1-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_28PINNAER1_PL
!:%{front%} NMN_28PINNAER1_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_28PAPWR1 !!= * __@CODE@__ papõŕ:papõr
! NUM_28PAPWR1-SG ;
! NUM_28PAPWR1_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_28PAPWR1-SG
!:%{back%} NMN_28PAPWR1-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_28PAPWR1_PL
!:%{back%} NMN_28PAPWR1_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_28KANNWL1 !!= * __@CODE@__ kannõĺ:kandõl
! NUM_28KANNWL1-SG ;
! NUM_28KANNWL1_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_28KANNWL1-SG
!:%{back%} NMN_28KANNWL1-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_28KANNWL1_PL
!:%{back%} NMN_28KANNWL1_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_28SWSAR1 !!= * __@CODE@__ sõsaŕ:sõsar
! NUM_28SWSAR1-SG ;
! NUM_28SWSAR1_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_28SWSAR1-SG
!:%{back%} NMN_28SWSAR1-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_28SWSAR1_PL
!:%{back%} NMN_28SWSAR1_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_28PUNDAR
! NUM_28PUNDAR-SG ;
! NUM_28PUNDAR_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_28PUNDAR-SG
!:%{back%} NMN_28PUNDAR/KAEMMAEL-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_28PUNDAR_PL
!:%{back%} NMN_28PUNDAR/KAEMMAEL_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_29KUU !!= * @CODE@ kuu:kuu
!! Gradation: No
! NUM_29KUU-SG ;
! NUM_29KUU_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_29KUU-SG
!:%{back%} NMN_29KUU-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_29KUU_PL
!:%{back%} NMN_29KUU_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_29HAEAE !!= * @CODE@ pää:pää
! Gradation: No
! NUM_29HAEAE-SG ;
! NUM_29HAEAE_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_29HAEAE-SG
!:%{front%} NMN_29HAEAE-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_29HAEAE_PL
!:%{front%} NMN_29HAEAE_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_30MAA
! Gradation: No
! NUM_30MAA-SG ;
! NUM_30MAA_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_30MAA-SG
!:%{back%} NMN_30MAA/TUEUE-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_30MAA_PL
!:%{back%} NMN_30MAA/TUEUE_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_30TUEUE
! Gradation: No
! NUM_30TUEUE-SG ;
! NUM_30TUEUE_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_30TUEUE-SG
!:%{front%} NMN_30MAA/TUEUE-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_30TUEUE_PL
!:%{front%} NMN_30MAA/TUEUE_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_31TAEI
! Gradation: No
! NUM_31TAEI-SG ;
! NUM_31TAEI_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_31TAEI-SG
!:%{front%} NMN_31TAEI-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_31TAEI_PL
!:%{front%} NMN_31TAEI_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_31MAI
! Gradation: No
! NUM_31MAI-SG ;
! NUM_31MAI_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_31MAI-SG
!:%{back%} NMN_31MAI-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_31MAI_PL
!:%{back%} NMN_31MAI_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_32VERI !!veri:ver
! NUM_32VERI-SG ;
! NUM_32VERI_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_32VERI-SG
!:%{front%} NMN_32VERI-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_32VERI_PL
!:%{front%} NMN_32VERI_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_33IGAE !!igä:igä
! gradation: yes
! NUM_33IGAE-SG ;
! NUM_33IGAE_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_33IGAE-SG
!:%{front%} NMN_33XX/IGAE-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_33IGAE_PL
!:%{front%} NMN_33XX/IGAE_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_34TULI
! NUM_34TULI-SG ;
! NUM_34TULI_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_34TULI-SG
!:%{back%} NMN_34TULI/SUELI-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_34TULI_PL
!:%{back%} NMN_34TULI/SUELI_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_35TARW
!! tarõ:tar
! NUM_35TARW-SG ;
! NUM_35TARW_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_35TARW-SG
!:%{back%} NMN_35TARW-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_35TARW_PL
!:%{back%} NMN_35TARW_PL ;

!LEXICON NUM_35PESAE
!! pesä:tar
! NUM_35PESAE-SG ;
! NUM_35PESAE_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_35PESAE-SG
!:%{front%} NMN_35UMA/PESAE-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_35PESAE_PL
!:%{front%} NMN_35UMA/PESAE_PL ;


!LEXICON NUM_35NIMI
!! nimi:nim
! NUM_35NIMI-SG ;
! NUM_35NIMI_PL ;
!LEXICON NUM_35NIMI-SG
!:%{front%} NMN_35LUMI/NIMI-SG ;
!LEXICON NUM_35NIMI_PL
!:%{front%} NMN_35LUMI/NIMI_PL ;

LEXICON NUM_36KATS1 !!= * @CODE@ katś:kat
 NUM_36KATS1-SG ;
 NUM_36KATS1_PL ;
LEXICON NUM_36KATS1-SG
:%{back%} NMN_36KATS1/UETS1-SG ;
LEXICON NUM_36KATS1_PL
:%{back%} NMN_36KATS1/UETS1_PL ;

LEXICON NUM_36UETS1 !!= * @CODE@ ütś:üt
 NUM_36UETS1-SG ;
 NUM_36UETS1_PL ;
LEXICON NUM_36UETS1-SG
:%{front%} NMN_36KATS1/UETS1-SG ;
LEXICON NUM_36UETS1_PL
:%{front%} NMN_36KATS1/UETS1_PL ;


LEXICON NUM_36KOKR
!! kokr:ko%{kg%}r
!! * Yaml: **N-kokr36**
        NUM_36KOKR-SG ;
        NUM_36KOKR_PL ;
LEXICON NUM_36KOKR-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_36KOKR-SG ;
